Arkansas, session 2025, HB1129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-3-306(a)(2)(A), concerning the
definitions used in relation to the property tax exemption for disabled
veterans, surviving spouses, and minor dependent children, is amended to read
as follows:
(A) “Homestead” means the:
(i) Dwelling that a disabled veteran, surviving
spouse of a disabled veteran, or minor dependent child of a disabled veteran
occupies as his or her principal place of residence; and
(ii) Up to forty (40) one hundred sixty (160) acres
of real property contiguous to the dwelling under subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) of
this section if the contiguous property is not being used for a commercial
*JLL030*
02-27-2025 10:27:46 JLL030

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1129
purpose; and

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for
assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/Gramlich






























02-27-2025 10:27:46 JLL030